Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4054.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-181, to read: START_STATUTE41-181. Veterans' reinvestment fund The Veterans' reinvestment fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations, grants, gifts, donations and contributions. the state treasurer, IN CONSULTATION with the director of the department of veterans' services, shall administer the fund. the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund.  Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations.  The state treasurer shall distribute fifty percent of the Monies in the fund each fiscal year to the department of veterans' services for programs that provide any of the following to veterans in this state: 1. Education and training. 2. Jobs and economic opportunities. 3. Health and wellness services. 4. Mental health and substance abuse services. 5. Housing. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; veterans' reinvestment fund; exemption A. The sum of $51,800,000 and thirty-one FTE positions are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the veterans' reinvestment fund established by section 41-181, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.